Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2683.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 18C.005, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4a. new text end new text begin Commercial nitrogen fertilizer. new text end new text begin "Commercial nitrogen fertilizer" means a fertilizer with a nitrogen content that is not less than 25 percent. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [18C.113] BIOFERTILIZER INNOVATION AND EFFICIENCY PROGRAM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Program established. new text end new text begin In consultation with the commissioner of natural resources and soil and water conservation districts in Minnesota, the commissioner of agriculture must develop and administer a biofertilizer innovation and efficiency program to address water quality by incentivizing Minnesota farmers to improve nitrogen management and incorporate innovative technologies into the farmers' crop nutrient management plans. The commissioner must determine which products qualify for the program, including soil amendments, fertilizers with nitrogen-fixing properties, biological sources of nitrogen, and other biofertilizers. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Payments to qualified farmers. new text end new text begin (a) In consultation with farmers and the fertilizer industry, the commissioner must establish a per-acre payment rate, not less than $5 per acre, for payments provided to a qualifying farmer. The program must provide an annual per-acre incentive payment to a qualifying farmer who verifies through documentation that the farmer has reduced commercial nitrogen fertilizer rates by using a qualifying product in the farmer's crop nutrient management plans by the lesser of: new text end new text begin (1) 15 percent; or new text end new text begin (2) 30 pounds per acre. new text end new text begin (b) The Department of Agriculture must annually review and may adjust the per-acre payment rate based on inflation and emerging fertilizer technology. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Qualifications. new text end new text begin To qualify for the biofertilizer water preservation program, a farmer must: new text end new text begin (1) be a Minnesota resident operating farmland located in Minnesota; new text end new text begin (2) submit documentation to the commissioner, including a crop nutrient management plan that will reduce the use of commercial nitrogen fertilizers at the reduction rate required under subdivision 2 by using a qualifying product determined by the commissioner under subdivision 1; and new text end new text begin (3) enroll a minimum of 40 eligible acres. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Review required. new text end new text begin Every two years, the commissioner must review: new text end new text begin (1) the program's required minimum commercial nitrogen fertilizer reduction rate under subdivision 2 and determine whether an increase in the minimum reduction rate is necessary; and new text end new text begin (2) additional qualifying products that may be used by farmers in the program. When making this determination, the commissioner must consider newly available technologies and products capable of reducing commercial nitrogen fertilizer applications. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Rulemaking required. new text end new text begin The commissioner must adopt rules to implement this section. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of agriculture to establish and administer the biofertilizer innovation and efficiency program. Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.28, any unencumbered balance at the end of fiscal year 2026 does not cancel and is available until June 30, 2027. new text end